Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB63.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 186 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Local government" means a city, county, charter county government, urban-county government,
consolidated local government, or unified local government;
(b) 1. "Special purpose vehicle" means an all-terrain vehicle, utility terrain vehicle, minitruck,
pneumatic-tired military vehicle, or full-size special purpose-built vehicle, including a vehicle
that is self-constructed or built by the original equipment manufacturer and a vehicle that has
been modified.
2. "Special purpose vehicle" does not include a low-speed vehicle as defined in KRS 186.010;
and
(c) 1. "Street-legal special purpose vehicle" means a special purpose vehicle that meets the
requirements of this section and is equipped with all of the following:
a. One (1) or more headlamps;
b. One (1) or more tail lamps;
c. One (1) or more brake lamps;
d. A trail lamp or other lamp constructed and placed to illuminate the registration plate
with a white light;
e. One (1) or more red reflectors on the rear of the vehicle;
f. An amber electric turn system, one (1) on each side of the front of the vehicle;
g. Amber or red electric turn signals on the rear of the vehicle;
h. A braking system, other than a parking brake;
i. A horn or other warning device;
j. A working muffler;
k. Rearview mirrors on the right and left side of the driver;
l. A windshield, unless the operator of the vehicle wears eye protection while operating
the vehicle;
m. A speedometer, illuminated for nighttime operation;
n. A roll bar or roll cage;
o. For multi-passenger vehicles a seatbelt assembly that conforms to the federal motor
vehicle safety standard provided in 49 C.F.R. sec. 571.209 for each designated seating
position; and
p. Tires that have at least two thirty-seconds (2/32) of an inch or greater tire tread.
2. "Street-legal special purpose vehicle" does not include a low-speed vehicle as defined in KRS
186.010 or a vehicle primarily used for farm or agricultural activities.
(2) A person shall not operate a street-legal special purpose vehicle on a highway if:
(a) The highway is located within the jurisdictional boundaries of a local government where the
operation of special purpose vehicles has not been allowed by local ordinance;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) The highway is a controlled-access system, including but not limited to an interstate or parkway; or
(c) The United States Department of Agriculture prohibits special purpose vehicles where the highway is
located.
(3) Nothing in this section authorizes the operation of a street-legal special purpose vehicle in an area that is
not open to motor vehicle use.
(4) Street-legal special purpose vehicles are prohibited from traveling a distance greater than twenty (20) miles
on a highway displaying centerline pavement markings.
(5) Minitrucks shall not be operated as street-legal special purpose vehicles on a highway that has been
constructed pursuant to a federal highway program.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a street-legal special purpose vehicle shall:
(a) Be registered in accordance with Section 3 of this Act;
(b) Be insured by the owner or operator for the payment of tort liabilities in the same form and amounts
as set forth in KRS 304.39-110 for motorcycles; and
(c) Comply with all other requirements in this chapter.
(7) Upon registration of any street-legal special purpose vehicle under Section 3 of this Act, the county clerk
shall issue the owner a motorcycle registration plate for the vehicle.
(8) Street-legal special purpose vehicles shall have an inspection completed by a certified inspector as required
by Section 5 of this Act.
(9) An applicant renewing his or her registration for a street-legal special purpose vehicle pursuant to Section
3 of this Act shall certify that the street-legal special purpose vehicle still meets all of the equipment
requirements in subsection (1)(c)1. of this section.
(10) The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A to implement this section.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 186 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The legislative body of a local government may, by ordinance, allow the operation of street-legal special
purpose vehicles, as defined in Section 1 of this Act, on highways within the local government's
jurisdictional boundaries.
(2) A local government may adopt more stringent local ordinances governing street-legal special purpose
vehicle safety equipment and operation than specified in Section 1 of this Act.
Section 3. KRS 186.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Before the owner of a motor vehicle, or street-legal special purpose vehicle as defined in Section 1 of this
Act, may operate it or permit its operation upon a highway, the owner shall apply for registration in accordance
with administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet, except that a person who purchases a motor
vehicle, or brings a motor vehicle into the Commonwealth from another state shall make application for
registration within fifteen (15) days. The bill of sale or assigned title must be in the motor vehicle during this
fifteen (15) day period. If the owner of a motor vehicle is an individual and resides in the Commonwealth, the
motor vehicle shall be registered with the county clerk of the county in which he or she resides. If the owner of
a motor vehicle does not reside in the Commonwealth, the motor vehicle shall be registered with the county
clerk of the county in which the motor vehicle is principally operated. If the owner of a motor vehicle is other
than an individual and resides in the Commonwealth, the motor vehicle shall be registered with the county
clerk of either county. The application when presented to the county clerk for registration shall be
accompanied by:
(a) A bill of sale and a manufacturer's certificate of origin if the application is for the registration of a new
motor vehicle;
(b) The owner's registration receipt, if the motor vehicle was last registered in this state;
(c) A bill of sale and the previous registration receipt, if last registered in another state where the law of
that state does not require the owner of a motor vehicle to obtain a certificate of title or ownership;

CHAPTER 89 3
(d) A certificate of title, if last registered in another state where the law of that state requires the owner of a
motor vehicle to obtain a certificate of title or ownership;
(e) An affidavit from an officer of a local government saying that the motor vehicle has been abandoned
and that the provisions of KRS 82.630 have been complied with, for local governments which elect to
use the provisions of KRS 82.600 to 82.640;[ and]
(f) The application from a person who has brought a motor vehicle into the Commonwealth from another
state shall be accompanied by proof that the motor vehicle is insured in compliance with KRS 304.39-
080; and
(g) Proof of insurance in compliance with Section 1 of this Act if the application is for the registration of
a street-legal special purpose vehicle.
(2) After that, except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the owner of any motor vehicle registered under
KRS 186.050(1) or (2) shall register his or her motor vehicle on or before the date on which his or her
certificate of registration expires. If, before operating the motor vehicle in this state, the owner registers it at
some later date and pays the fee for the full year, he or she will be deemed to have complied with the law.
Insofar as the owner is concerned, registration with the clerk shall be deemed to be registration with the
cabinet.
(3) After that, the owner of any commercial vehicle registered under KRS 186.050(3) to (14) shall register the
commercial vehicle on or before April 1 of each year. If, before operating a commercial vehicle in this state,
the owner registers it at some later date and pays the required fee, he or she will be deemed to have complied
with the law. Insofar as the owner is concerned, registration with the clerk shall be deemed to be registration
with the cabinet, except the owner of any commercial motor vehicle to be registered pursuant to the
International Registration Plan under KRS 186.050(13) shall register the commercial motor vehicles on or
before the last day of the month of registration established pursuant to KRS 186.051(3).
(4) The application and documents presented therewith, including the sheriff's certificate of inspection, shall be
affixed to the Transportation Cabinet copy of the certificate of title or registration and sent to the
Transportation Cabinet by the clerk.
(5) At least forty-five (45) days prior to the expiration of registration of any motor vehicle previously registered in
the Commonwealth as provided by KRS 186A.035, the owner of the vehicle shall be notified by mail on the
same notice required by KRS 134.805(5) of the date of expiration. In addition, the department shall provide
appropriate forms and information to permit renewal of motor vehicle registration to be completed by mail.
Any registration renewal by mail shall require payment of an additional two dollar ($2) fee which shall be
received by the county clerk. Nonreceipt of the notice herein shall not constitute a defense to any registration
related offense.
(6) (a) If an individual has been serving in the United States military stationed or assigned to a base or other
location outside the boundaries of the United States, he or she shall renew the registration on the vehicle
within thirty (30) days of his or her return if:
1. The motor vehicle has been stored on a military base during the time of deployment and has not
been operated on the public highways during that time; and
2. The vehicle's registration expired during the individual's absence.
(b) An individual who meets the criteria in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not be convicted or cited
for driving a vehicle with expired registration within thirty (30) days after the individual's return to the
Commonwealth if the individual can provide proof of meeting the eligibility criteria under paragraph
(a) of this subsection.
(c) When an individual presents evidence of meeting the criteria under paragraph (a) of this subsection
when applying to renew the registration on the motor vehicle, the county clerk shall, when applicable,
treat the registration as a prorated renewal under KRS 186.051, and charge the individual a registration
fee only for the number of months of the registration year the vehicle will be used on the public
highways.
(7) The provisions of this section shall not apply to vehicles for which permanent registration has been obtained
pursuant to KRS 186A.127.
Section 4. KRS 186.050 is amended to read as follows:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) The annual registration fee shall be eleven dollars and fifty cents ($11.50) for:
(a) Motor vehicles, including pickup trucks and passenger vans; and
(b) Motor carrier vehicles, as defined in KRS 281.010, primarily designed for carrying passengers or
passengers for hire and having been designed or constructed to transport not more than fifteen (15)
passengers, including the operator.
(2) (a) Except as provided in KRS 186.041 and 186.162, the annual registration fee for each motorcycle shall
be nine dollars ($9).
(b) The annual registration fee for a street-legal special purpose vehicle shall be ten dollars ($10).
(3) (a) All motor vehicles having a declared gross weight of vehicle and any towed unit of more than ten
thousand (10,000) pounds are classified as commercial vehicles and the annual registration fee shall be
as set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The registration fee for all motor vehicles engaged in hauling passengers for hire which are designed or
constructed to transport more than fifteen (15) passengers including the operator shall be one hundred
dollars ($100). The registration fee for all other commercial vehicles, except as provided in subsections
(4) to (10) and (13) of this section, shall be as follows:
Declared Gross Weight of Vehicle Registration
and Any Towed Unit Fee
10,001-14,000 30.00
14,001-18,000 50.00
18,001-22,000 132.00
22,001-26,000 160.00
26,001-32,000 216.00
32,001-38,000 300.00
38,001-44,000 474.00
44,001-55,000 699.00
55,001-62,000 1,037.00
62,001-73,280 1,280.00
73,281-80,000 1,440.00
(4) (a) 1. Any farmer owning a truck having a gross weight of twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds or less
may have it registered as a farmer's truck and obtain a license for eleven dollars and fifty cents
($11.50). The applicant's signature upon the certificate of registration and ownership shall
constitute a certificate that the applicant is a farmer engaged in the production of crops, livestock,
or dairy products, that the applicant owns a truck of the gross weight of twenty-six thousand
(26,000) pounds or less, and that during the next twelve (12) months the truck shall not be used
in for-hire transportation and may be used in transporting persons, food, provender, feed,
machinery, livestock, material, and supplies necessary for the applicant's farming operation, and
the products grown on the applicant's farm.
2. Any farmer owning a truck having a gross weight of twenty-six thousand one (26,001) pounds to
thirty-eight thousand (38,000) pounds may have it registered as a farmer's truck and obtain a
license for eleven dollars and fifty cents ($11.50). The applicant's signature upon the certificate
of registration and ownership shall constitute a certificate that the applicant is a farmer engaged
in the production of crops, livestock, or dairy products, that the applicant owns a truck of the
gross weight between twenty-six thousand one (26,001) pounds and thirty-eight thousand
(38,000) pounds, and that during the next twelve (12) months the truck shall not be used in for-
hire transportation and may be used in transporting persons, food, provender, feed, machinery,
livestock, material, and supplies necessary for the applicant's farming operation and the products
grown on the applicant's farm.

CHAPTER 89 5
(b) Any farmer owning a truck having a declared gross weight in excess of thirty-eight thousand (38,000)
pounds shall not be required to pay the fee set out in subsection (3) of this section and, in lieu thereof,
shall pay forty percent (40%) of the fee set out in subsection (3) of this section and shall be exempt
from any fee charged under the provisions of KRS 281.752. The applicant's signature upon the
registration receipt shall be considered to be a certification that the applicant is a farmer engaged solely
in the production of crops, livestock, or dairy products, and that during the current registration year the
truck will be used only in transporting persons, food, provender, feed, and machinery used in operating
the applicant's farm and the products grown on the applicant's farm.
(c) An initial applicant for, or an applicant renewing, his or her registration pursuant to this subsection, may
at the time of application make a voluntary contribution to be deposited into the agricultural program
trust fund established in KRS 246.247. The recommended voluntary contribution shall be set at ten
dollars ($10) and automatically added to the cost of registration or renewal unless the individual
registering or renewing the vehicle opts out of contributing the recommended amount. The county clerk
shall collect and forward the voluntary contribution to the cabinet for distribution to the Department of
Agriculture.
(5) Any person owning a bus used solely in transporting school children and school employees may have the bus
registered as a school bus and obtain a license for eleven dollars and fifty cents ($11.50) by filing with the
county clerk, in addition to other information required, an affidavit stating that the bus is used solely in the
transportation of school children and persons employed in the schools of the district, that the words "School
Bus" are printed on each side of the bus and on the rear door in letters at least six (6) inches high, and of a
conspicuous color, and the bus will be used during the next twelve (12) months only for the purpose stated.
(6) Any church or religious organization owning a bus used solely in transporting persons to and from a place of
worship or for other religious work may have the bus registered as a church bus and obtain a license for eleven
dollars and fifty cents ($11.50) by filing with the county clerk, in addition to other information required, an
affidavit stating that the bus will be used only for the transporting of persons to and from a place of worship, or
for other religious work, and that there has been printed on the bus in large letters the words "Church Bus,"
with the name of the church or religious organization owning and using the or bus, and that during the next
twelve (12) months the bus will be used only for the purpose stated.
(7) Any person owning a motor vehicle with a gross weight of fourteen thousand (14,000) pounds or less on
which a wrecker crane or other equipment suitable for wrecker service has been permanently mounted may
register the vehicle and obtain a license for eleven dollars and fifty cents ($11.50) by filing with the county
clerk, in addition to other information required, an affidavit that a wrecker crane or other equipment suitable
for wrecker service has been permanently mounted on the vehicle and that during the next twelve (12) months
the vehicle will be used only in wrecker service. If the gross weight of the vehicle exceeds fourteen thousand
(14,000) pounds, the vehicle shall be registered in accordance with subsection (3) of this section. The gross
weight of a vehicle used in wrecker service shall not include the weight of the vehicle being towed by the
wrecker.
(8) Motor vehicles having a declared gross weight in excess of eighteen thousand (18,000) pounds, which when
operated in this state are used exclusively for the transportation of property within the limits of the city named
in the affidavit hereinafter required to be filed, or within ten (10) miles of the city limits of the city if it is a city
with a population equal to or greater than three thousand (3,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial
census, or within five (5) miles of its limits if it is a city with a population of less than three thousand (3,000)
based upon the most recent federal decennial census, or anywhere within a county containing an urban-county
government, shall not be required to pay the fee as set out in subsection (3) of this section, and in lieu thereof
shall pay seventy-five percent (75%) of the fee set forth in subsection (3) of this section and shall be exempt
from any fee charged under the provisions of KRS 281.752. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit
any right of nonresidents to exemption from registration under any other provisions of the laws granting
reciprocity to nonresidents. Operations outside of this state shall not be considered in determining whether or
not the foregoing mileage limitations have been observed. When claiming the right to the reduced fee, the
applicant's signature on the certificate of registration and ownership shall constitute a certification or affidavit
stating that the motor vehicle when used within this state is used only for the transportation of property within
the city to be named in the affidavit and the area above set out and that the vehicle will not be used outside of a
city and the area above set out during the current registration period.
(9) Motor vehicles having a declared gross weight in excess of eighteen thousand (18,000) pounds, which are used
exclusively for the transportation of primary forest products from the harvest area to a mill or other processing
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
facility, where the mill or processing facility is located at a point not more than fifty (50) air miles from the
harvest area or which are used exclusively for the transportation of concrete blocks or ready-mixed concrete
from the point at which the concrete blocks or ready-mixed concrete is produced to a construction site where
the concrete blocks or ready-mixed concrete is to be used, where the construction site is located at a point not
more than thirty (30) air miles from the point at which the concrete blocks or ready-mixed concrete is
produced shall not be required to pay the fee as set out in subsection (3) of this section, and in lieu thereof,
shall pay seventy-five percent (75%) of the fee set out in subsection (3) of this section and shall be exempt
from any fee charged under the provisions of KRS 281.752. The applicant's signature upon the certificate of
registration and ownership shall constitute a certification that the motor vehicle will not be used during the
current registration period in any manner other than that for which the reduced fee is provided in this section.
(10) Any owner of a commercial vehicle registered for a declared gross weight in excess of eighteen thousand
(18,000) pounds, intending to transfer same and desiring to take advantage of the refund provisions of KRS
186.056(2), may reregister the vehicle and obtain a "For Sale" certificate of registration and ownership for one
dollar ($1). Title to a vehicle so registered may be transferred, but the registration shall not authorize the
operation or use of the vehicle on any public highway. No refund may be made under the provisions of KRS
186.056(2) until the title to the vehicle has been transferred to the purchaser thereof. Provided, however, that
nothing herein shall be so construed as to prevent the seller of a commercial vehicle from transferring the
registration of the vehicle to any purchaser thereof.
(11) The annual registration fee for self-propelled vehicles containing sleeping or eating facilities shall be twenty
dollars ($20) and the multiyear license plate issued shall be designated "Recreational vehicle." The foregoing
shall not include any motor vehicle primarily designed for commercial or farm use having temporarily
attached thereto any sleeping or eating facilities, or any commercial vehicle having sleeping facilities.
(12) The registration fee on any vehicle registered under this section shall be increased fifty percent (50%) when
the vehicle is not equipped wholly with pneumatic tires.
(13) (a) The Department of Vehicle Regulation is authorized to negotiate and execute an agreement or
agreements for the purpose of developing and instituting proportional registration of motor vehicles
engaged in interstate commerce, or in a combination of interstate and intrastate commerce, and
operating into, through, or within the Commonwealth of Kentucky. The agreement or agreements may
be made on a basis commensurate with, and determined by, the miles traveled on, and use made of, the
highways of this Commonwealth as compared with the miles traveled on and use made of highways of
other states, or upon any other equitable basis of proportional registration. Notwithstanding the
provisions of KRS 186.020, the cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations concerning the
registration of motor vehicles under any agreement or agreements made under this section and shall
provide for direct issuance by it of evidence of payment of any registration fee required under the
agreement or agreements. Any proportional registration fee required to be collected under any
proportional registration agreement or agreements shall be in accordance with the taxes established in
this section.
(b) Any owner of a commercial vehicle who is required to title his or her motor vehicle under this section
shall first title the vehicle with the county clerk pursuant to KRS 186.020 for a state fee of one dollar
($1). Title to the vehicle may be transferred; however title without proper registration shall not
authorize the operation or use of the vehicle on any public highway. Any commercial vehicle properly
titled in Kentucky may also be registered in Kentucky, and, upon payment of the required fees, the
department may issue an apportioned registration plate to the commercial vehicle.
(c) Any commercial vehicle that is properly titled in a foreign jurisdiction, which vehicle is subject to
apportioned registration, as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection, may be registered in Kentucky,
and, upon proof of proper title and payment of the required fees, the department may issue an
apportioned registration plate to the commercial vehicle. The department shall promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with this section.
(14) Any person seeking to obtain a special license plate for an automobile that has been provided to the applicant
pursuant to an occupation shall meet both of the following requirements:
(a) The automobile shall be provided for the full-time exclusive use of the applicant; and
(b) The applicant shall obtain permission in writing from the vehicle owner or lessee on a form provided by
the cabinet to use the vehicle and for the vehicle to bear the special license plate.

CHAPTER 89 7
(15) An applicant for any motor vehicle registration issued pursuant to this section shall have the opportunity to
make a donation of two dollars ($2) to promote a hunger relief program through specific wildlife management
and conservation efforts by the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources in accordance with KRS 150.015.
If an applicant elects to make a contribution under this subsection, the two dollar ($2) donation shall be added
to the regular fee for any motor vehicle registration issued pursuant to this section. One (1) donation may be
made per issuance of each registration. The fee shall be paid to the county clerk and shall be transmitted by the
State Treasurer to the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources to be used exclusively for the purpose of
wildlife management and conservation activities in support of hunger relief. The county clerk may retain up to
five percent (5%) of the fees collected under this subsection for administrative costs associated with the
collection of this donation. Any donation requested under this subsection shall be voluntary and may be
refused by the applicant at the time of issuance or renewal of a license plate.
(16) In addition to the fees outlined in this section, the county clerk shall collect from the registrants of electric
vehicles and electric motorcycles the electric vehicle ownership fees imposed in KRS 138.475. The county
clerk may retain one dollar ($1) of the fee collected under this subsection.
Section 5. KRS 186A.115 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the owner of every vehicle brought into this state and
required to be titled in this state shall, before submitting his or her application for title to the county
clerk, have the vehicle together with his or her application for title and its supporting documents
inspected by a certified inspector in the county in which the application for title is to be submitted to the
county clerk.
(b) An owner of a military surplus vehicle seeking title in this state shall, before submitting his or her
application for title to the county clerk, have the vehicle together with his or her application for title and
its supporting documents inspected by a certified inspector in the county in which the application for
title is to be submitted to the county clerk.
(c) An owner of a street-legal special purpose vehicle, as defined in Section 1 of this Act, seeking to
register under Section 3 of this Act shall, before submitting his or her application for title to the
county clerk, have the special purpose vehicle inspected by a certified inspector. There shall be a
twenty-five dollar ($25) fee for the certification of a special purpose vehicle, payable to the sheriff's
office.
(2) For inspections under this section:
(a) The certified inspector shall be certified through the Department of Vehicle Regulation following
requirements set forth by the department by regulation and shall be designated by the county sheriff if
the inspector is a current member of his or her office or a special inspector appointed pursuant to KRS
70.030. The certified inspector will be held responsible for all certifications required pursuant to this
chapter and will be liable for any and all penalties prescribed in this chapter, and shall be available
during regular office hours at any and all offices and branches that issue applications for titles;
(b) There shall be a fee for this certification, payable to the sheriff's office, and the fee shall be retained by
the sheriff's office for official expenses of the office upon completion of certification, in the amount of:
1. Thirty dollars ($30) for a motor vehicle dealer that qualifies to have an employee appointed as a
special inspector under paragraph (d) of this subsection;
2. Fifteen dollars ($15) for a motor vehicle dealer that does not qualify to have an employee
appointed as a special inspector under paragraph (d) of this subsection; or
3. Fifteen dollars ($15) for an individual person;
(c) There shall be an additional fee of twenty dollars ($20) per trip when it becomes necessary for the
certified inspector to travel to the site of the vehicle rather than bringing the vehicle to the sheriff's
inspection area;
(d) A sheriff may appoint up to two (2) employees of a motor vehicle dealer that is licensed under KRS
Chapter 190 and doing business in the sheriff's county as special inspectors if the motor vehicle dealer
is:
1. A new motor vehicle dealer; or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2. A used motor vehicle dealer that has sold an average of one hundred (100) or more motor
vehicles per month in the preceding twelve (12) months;
(e) A special inspector appointed under paragraph (d) of this subsection is only authorized to perform
motor vehicle inspections and complete certified inspection forms under this section for vehicles
purchased by that dealership for resale and shall have his or her special inspector status revoked if he or
she is no longer an active employee of that dealership; and
(f) An inspection conducted in one (1) county within the Commonwealth of Kentucky under this
subsection, and the fees paid for that inspection under this subsection, shall be honored by the certified
inspector, sheriff, and county clerk in all other counties within this state. A second inspection shall not
be required and additional fees shall not be required.
(3) The Transportation Cabinet may require that modifications be made to a military surplus vehicle. Any
modifications required by the cabinet under this section shall be made to the military surplus vehicle prior to
its inspection.
(4) The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to
implement the provisions of subsections (1)(b) and (3) of this section, including but not limited to vehicle
modification requirements and the creation of a separate electronic inspection form. The Transportation
Cabinet shall note that military vehicles were originally manufactured under the federally mandated
requirements set forth in 49 C.F.R. sec. 571.7 and shall only require these vehicles to meet applicable federal
motor vehicle safety standards.
(5) The following vehicles are excluded from the requirement of inspection by a certified inspector prior to titling
in this state:
(a) New motor vehicles sold by a dealer licensed in this state;
(b) Vehicles required to be registered in this state by reason of lack of a reciprocity agreement with another
state and for which a nonnegotiable registration document is to be issued;
(c) Motor vehicles operated by a motor carrier under a nonnegotiable certificate or permit issued by the
Department of Vehicle Regulation;
(d) Motor vehicles owned by servicemen or servicewomen who are residents of Kentucky stationed outside
of Kentucky may be inspected by the post provost or similar officer of the camp, post, or station. The
post provost or similar officer shall submit an affidavit stating the name of the owner, the identification
or serial number, the make, body style, current license or title number, if any, and state in which
currently registered or titled, if any, of the motor vehicle;
(e) Motor vehicles purchased in another state by persons who are residents of Kentucky but are temporarily
residing out of state for at least thirty (30) days, but not longer than nine (9) months, may after the
purchase of the vehicle be inspected by the state police, a local law enforcement agency, or the vehicle
inspection program of another state. If an inspector in another state examines a vehicle under this
paragraph, the purchaser may request the inspector to complete an affidavit stating the name of the
owner, the vehicle identification number, the vehicle make and body style, the current state of
registration, if any, and the current vehicle license or title number, if any. The Transportation Cabinet
shall create an affidavit form containing at a minimum this information and shall post the form on the
cabinet's internet website. A person using an inspector in another state under this paragraph shall
comply with all requirements of that state's inspection program, including payment of fees charged in
that state. A person registering a motor vehicle for the first time in Kentucky under this paragraph shall
transmit the application for registration, all supporting documentation, and payment for registration and
usage tax to the county clerk of the county in which the person resides, and upon receipt of the
appropriate documentation, the county clerk shall register the vehicle; and
(f) Motor vehicles no longer located in Kentucky but which require inspection in order to issue a corrected
Kentucky title due to error in vehicle identification or serial number may be inspected by an inspector
authorized to inspect vehicle identification or serial number by the laws of the state or foreign country
where application for a new title has been submitted.
(6) When presented to a certified inspector for inspection and to a county clerk for processing, the owner's
application for a first certificate of registration or title in his or her name shall be accompanied by a current
operator's license and one (1) of the following documents as applicable:

CHAPTER 89 9
(a) If the vehicle is a new vehicle not previously registered in this state, the properly assigned
manufacturer's statement of origin for the vehicle for which registration or title is sought;
(b) If the vehicle was last registered in this state, and is a vehicle for which a title is not required in this
state, a certificate of registration, or if the vehicle is one for which a certificate of title is required in this
state, a properly assigned certificate of title;
(c) If the vehicle was last previously titled in another state, a properly assigned certificate of title;
(d) If the application refers to a vehicle previously registered in another country, the documents of that
country establishing ownership of the vehicle;
(e) If the application refers to a vehicle last previously registered in another country by a person on active
duty in the Armed Forces of the United States, the county clerk may accept on behalf of the Department
of Vehicle Regulation evidence of ownership provided the applicant by the United States Department of
Defense; and
(f) Except as provided in KRS 186A.072(2)(c) governing custom-built motorcycles, if the application
relates to a vehicle which has been specially constructed or reconstructed, that fact shall be stated in the
application, and the application shall be accompanied by the documents specified by administrative
regulations of the Department of Vehicle Regulation.
(7) When requested to inspect a vehicle pursuant to this section, the certified inspector shall personally and
physically inspect the vehicle, when registration or title is sought in this state, on the following points:
(a) He or she shall compare the vehicle identification number as appearing on both the vehicle
identification number plate, and the federal safety standards label of the vehicle which is sought to be
registered or titled, with the corresponding number inscribed on the application, and its supporting
documentation, and ensure that the vehicle identification number appearing at each described location
appears legitimate and that they are consistent with each other;
(b) He or she shall examine the primary odometer of the vehicle and electronically record the reading in the
space provided in the inspection section of the application;
(c) After exercising due diligence in inspecting the vehicle and its supporting documentation, and finding
that they appear to be in order, the certified inspector shall execute the electronic certificate of
inspection according to its terms by electronically inputting in the spaces provided his or her first name,
middle initial, and last name, certified inspector number, his or her title; the name of the county in
which he or she serves; and the telephone number including the telephone area code of his or her
agency, and enter the month, day, and year in which his or her inspection was made, certifying under
penalty of forgery in the second degree the character, accuracy, and date of his or her inspection; and
(d) A certified inspector number shall not be subject to an open records request under KRS 61.870 to
61.884 unless otherwise required by a court order.
(8) The certified inspector shall refrain from executing the certificate of inspection if:
(a) He or she has not personally and physically inspected the vehicle in accordance with this section;
(b) He or she has reason to believe that the vehicle displays an unlawfully altered vehicle identification
number;
(c) The application and any of its copies are illegible or otherwise improperly executed, or contain
information reasonably believed to be inaccurate or fraudulent;
(d) The documentation required in support of any application is not present, or not consistent with the
vehicle and the owner's application or appears fraudulent; or
(e) He or she has probable cause to believe the vehicle is stolen.
(9) (a) Inspections on motor vehicles that meet the definition of a "historic vehicle" under KRS 186.043(2) and
are brought into this state shall be limited to verification of the vehicle identification number with
supporting documentation for purposes of titling.
(b) Inspections on motor vehicles that meet the definition of a classic motor vehicle project as set forth in
KRS 186A.510 shall be limited to verification of the vehicle identification number with supporting
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
documentation for purposes of issuing a classic motor vehicle project certificate of title under KRS
186A.535(1).
(10) The electronic certificate of inspection shall not be handled by any person or persons other than those
designated individuals within the offices of the sheriff, county clerk, or other state office.
(11) The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to
implement the provisions of this section, including but not limited to special inspectors classified as dealer
inspectors only and the creation of an electronic certified vehicle inspection form and receipt.
Became law without Governor's signature March 26, 2025.